California statutes. Insurance Code
995.6.

The provisions of Sections 995.1, 995.2, and 995.3 permitting the commissioner, in certain situations, to examine a person operating under a contingent or retrospective commission arrangement with an insurer at the expense of the insurer, and the other provisions of this article, shall not prevent the insurer from making a contract in advance with such person that in such event the person will reimburse the insurer for such expense. If in the course of examining such person the commissioner finds such person also operates under such contingent or retrospective commission arrangements with other insurers, he may prorate the expense of examination on an equitable basis among all the insurers so dealing with the person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1818.)
-------------------------------------------

995.7.

The purposes of Section 816 and the provisions of this article are to promote the solvency of insurers and the producers dealing with them under contracts, arrangements and practices therein described; to protect the public from unjustifiable claims practices and the inconvenience, hardship and possible loss attendant upon the insolvency of any of the insurers or persons described therein; and to prevent any frauds or mistakes which may arise from any of the contracts, arrangements or practices described therein. In furtherance of these purposes the commissioner shall at least 90 days prior to charging any person with a violation of Section 816 or the provisions of this article make reasonable rules and regulations clarifying or defining any word, term or phrase used in Section 816 or in this article, including establishment of detailed standards to determine solvency as that word is used in Section 995.2. Such rules and regulations shall be adopted, amended or repealed in accordance with the procedures provided in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11371) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1818.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13.5. Disability Insurance Reserves [997. - 997.]

997.

(a) For statement purposes as defined in Article 10 (commencing with Section 900), for insolvency calculations as defined in Article 13 (commencing with Section 980), and for the valuation of the liabilities of insurers for all other purposes, every admitted insurer shall maintain an active life reserve which shall place a sound value on its liabilities under all disability policies and which shall not be less than the reserve according to the standards set forth in regulations issued by the commissioner and, in no event, less in the aggregate than the pro rata gross unearned premium reserve for the policies. The promulgation of the regulations by the commissioner or any changes or amendments thereof shall be in accordance with the procedure provided in Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

Subdivisions (b), (c), and (d) shall control the amounts of reserves and liabilities, other than for specific claim losses, upon all individual disability policies until the effective date of regulations issued by the commissioner as provided in the next preceding paragraph. The regulations, in lieu of subdivisions (b), (c), and (d), shall control the amounts of the reserves and liabilities during the time the regulations continue in force. In the event the regulations shall cease to be in effect, the reserves and liabilities again shall be controlled by subdivisions (b), (c), and (d) during the time no such regulations shall be in force.

(b) Every admitted insurer which issues one or more of the following three types of individual disability policies shall maintain a reserve not less than the minimum reserve required under this subdivision:

(1) Policies which are guaranteed renewable for life or to a specified age at guaranteed premium rates.

(2) Policies which are guaranteed renewable for life or to a specified age but under which the insurer has reserved the right to change the scale of premiums. 

(3) Policies, other than those described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), in which the insurer has reserved the right to cancel or to refuse renewal for one or more reasons, but has agreed implicitly or explicitly that, prior to a specified time or age, it will not cancel or decline renewal solely because of deterioration of health after issue.

During the period within which the renewability of the policy is guaranteed or the insurer’s right to cancel the policy or to refuse renewal thereof is limited, the minimum reserve shall be an amount computed on the basis of two-year preliminary term tabular mean reserves employing the following assumptions:

Mortality and Interest: those assumptions specified in Article 3 (commencing with Section 10478) and Article 3a (commencing with Section 10489.1) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 2, for the determination of minimum policy reserve liabilities for ordinary life insurance.

Morbidity or other contingency: any tables adopted by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners, or its successor, that is approved by regulation promulgated by the commissioner for use in determining the minimum standard of valuation for use in valuing individual disability insurance policies, or any modification of these tables approved by the commissioner, or any tables based upon individual insurer’s own experience and approved by the commissioner.

For each benefit, each company shall establish reserves that place a sound value on the liabilities for the benefit.

These mean reserves shall be diminished or offset by appropriate credit for the valuation net deferred premiums. In no event, however, shall the aggregate reserves for all policies valued on the mean reserve basis, diminished by any credit for deferred premiums, be less than the gross pro rata unearned premiums under the policies.

Negative reserves for any benefit may be offset against positive reserves for other benefits in the same individual or family policy, but if all benefits of the policy collectively develop a negative reserve, credit shall not be taken for the amount.

(c) Every admitted insurer which issues one or more of the following types of individual disability policies shall maintain the minimum unearned premium reserve required under this subdivision:

(1) Selected group disability policies issued under or subject to an agreement that, except for stated reasons, the insurer will not cancel or refuse to renew the coverage of individual insureds prior to a specified age unless all coverage under the same group is terminated.

(2) Any type of individual disability policy not included in one of the three types described in subdivision (b) and not included in paragraph (1) of this subdivision.

The minimum unearned premium reserve shall be the pro rata unearned portion of gross premiums in force and, subject to the limitations contained in Sections 922.2 to 922.8, inclusive, shall be reduced by premiums paid or credited for risks reinsured in solvent insurers.

(d) Provided the reserve on all policies to which the method or basis is applied is not less in the aggregate than the required amount determined according to the applicable standards specified in subdivisions (b) and (c), an insurer may use any reasonable assumptions as to the interest rate, mortality rates or the rates of morbidity or other contingency, and may introduce an assumption as to the voluntary termination of policies. Also, subject to the preceding conditions, the insurer may employ methods other than the methods stated in subdivisions (b) and (c) in determining a sound value of its liabilities under such policies, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(1) The use of midterminal reserves in addition to either the gross pro rata unearned premium reserves described in subdivision (c) or the net pro rata unearned premium reserve.

(2) Optional use of either the level premium, the one-year preliminary term or the two-year preliminary term method.

(3) Prospective valuation on the basis of actual gross premiums with reasonable allowance for future expense.

(4) The use of approximations such as those involving age groupings, groupings of several years of issue, average amounts of indemnity.

(5) The computation of the reserve for one policy benefit as a percentage of, or by other relation to, the aggregate policy reserves, exclusive of the benefit or benefits so valued.

(6) The use of a composite annual claim cost for all or any combination of the benefits included in the policies valued.

For statement purposes the net reserve liability for active lives may be shown as the mean reserve with offsetting asset items for net unpaid and deferred premiums or it may be shown as the excess of the mean reserve over the amount of net unpaid and deferred premiums, or, regardless of the underlying method of calculation, it may be divided between the gross pro rata unearned premium reserve and a balancing item for the “additional reserve.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 193, Sec. 89.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 14. Proceedings in Cases of Insolvency and Delinquency [1010. - 1062.]

1010.

(a) The provisions of this article shall apply to all persons, except the State Compensation Insurance Fund, subject to examination by the commissioner, or purporting to do insurance business in this state, or in the process of organization with intent to do such business therein, or from whom the commissioner’s certificate of authority is required for the transaction of business, or whose certificate of authority is revoked or suspended.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), if
 any of the conditions set forth in Section 1011 exists with respect to the State Compensation Insurance Fund, and the commissioner would otherwise file a verified application with the superior court or proceed under Section 1013 against the fund, the commissioner shall instead issue a report to the Governor, the President pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Speaker of the Assembly setting forth the conditions that exist and recommending a course to remedy those conditions. The Governor, in consultation with the Legislature, shall direct a course of action to be implemented by the fund’s board of directors, or if additional legislative action is necessary, recommend a course of action to the Legislature, or both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 740, Sec. 3.9.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

1011.

The superior court of the county in which the principal office of a person described in Section 1010 is located, upon the filing by the commissioner of the verified application showing any of the conditions in this subdivision exist, or a filing by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation of the verified application showing that the conditions enumerated in subdivision (j) exist and the conditions set forth in Section 5383(e)(3) of Title 12 of the United States Code having been satisfied, shall issue its order vesting title to all of the assets of that person, wheresoever situated, in the commissioner or his or her successor in office, in his or her official capacity, and direct the commissioner forthwith to take possession of all of its books, records,
 property, real and personal, and assets, and to conduct, as conservator, the business of the person, or so much thereof as to the commissioner may seem appropriate, and enjoining the person and its officers, directors, agents, servants, and employees from the transaction of its business or disposition of its property until any of the following further order of the court:

(a) That the person has refused to submit its books, papers, accounts, or affairs to the reasonable inspection of the commissioner or his or her deputy or examiner.

(b) That the person has neglected or refused to observe an order of the commissioner to make good within the time prescribed by law any deficiency in its capital if it is a stock corporation, or in its reserve if it is a mutual insurer.

(c) That the person, without first obtaining the consent in writing of the commissioner, has transferred, or attempted to transfer, substantially its entire property or business or, without consent, has entered into any transaction the effect of which is to merge, consolidate, or reinsure substantially its entire property or business in or with the property or business of any other person.

(d) That the person is found, after an examination, to be in a condition that makes its further transaction of business hazardous to its policyholders, or creditors, or to the public.

(e) That the person has violated its charter or any law of the state.

(f) That any officer of
 the person refuses to be examined under oath, touching its affairs.

(g) That any officer or attorney in fact of the person has embezzled, sequestered, or wrongfully diverted any of the assets of the person.

(h) That a domestic insurer does not comply with the requirements for the issuance to it of a certificate of authority, or that its certificate of authority has been revoked.

(i) That the last report of examination of any person to whom the provisions of this article apply shows the person to be insolvent within the meaning of Article 13 (commencing with Section 980) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1; or if a reciprocal or interinsurance exchange, within the applicable provisions of Section 1370.2, 1370.4,
 1371, or 1372; or if a life insurer, within the applicable provisions of Sections 10510 and 10511.

(j) Notification is given by the United States Secretary of the Treasury that a determination has been made by the secretary, in accordance with and satisfying the provisions of Section 5383(b) of Title 12 of the United States Code, as to a person described in Section 1010 that is an insurance company as defined in Section 5381(a)(13) of Title 12 of the United States Code, and one of the following:

(1) The board of directors, or body performing similar functions, of the person acquiesces or consents to the appointment of a receiver as provided for in Section 5832(a)(1)(A)(i) of Title 12 of the United States Code, with that consent to be considered to be consent to issuance of an
 order under this section.

(2) The United States District Court for the District of Columbia issued an order for the appointment of a receiver of the person as provided for in Section 5382(a)(1)(A)(iv)(I) of Title 12 of the United States Code, without regard to whether an appeal of the order is pending.

(3) A petition by the United States Secretary of the Treasury for appointment of a receiver was made to the United States District Court for the District of Columbia and was granted by operation of the law as provided for in Section 5382(a)(1)(A)(v) of Title 12 of the United States Code, without regard to whether an appeal of the order is pending.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 321, Sec. 7.   (AB 1391)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

1011.1.

If a verified application is filed pursuant to Section 1011 that shows that the conditions set forth in subdivision (j) of Section 1011 exist and upon a showing that notice was provided to the person that is the subject of the verification application, all of the following apply:

(a) A superior court hearing shall be held in which the person may oppose the verified application solely on the grounds that the conditions set forth in subdivision (j) of Section 1101 do not exist. The hearing shall be completed within 24 hours after the verified application is filed with the court.

(b) The superior court shall issue an order as provided for in Section
 1011 within 24 hours after the verified application was filed with the court.

(c) If the superior court does not issue an order within 24 hours as provided for in subdivision (b), then an order described in Section 1011 shall be deemed granted by operation of law upon expiration of the 24-hour period, without further notice.

(d) An order entered by the superior court pursuant to subdivision (b) or entered by operation of law pursuant to subdivision (c) shall not be subject to any stay or injunction pending appeal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 321, Sec. 8.   (AB 1391)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

1011.5.

The consent described in subdivision (c) of Section 1011 shall be obtained by filing an application with the commissioner in a form to be prescribed by him or her accompanied by that additional information concerning the insurer, its condition and affairs, as the commissioner requires.

A fee of six thousand three hundred fifty dollars ($6,350) shall be paid to the commissioner for the filing of the application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 18.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1012.

Except in the case of an order issued based on a verified application showing the conditions in subdivision (j) of Section 1011 to exist, the order shall continue in force and effect until, on the application either of the commissioner or of that person, it shall, after a full hearing, appear to the court that the ground for the order directing the commissioner to take title and possession does not exist or has been removed and that the person can properly resume title and possession of its property and the conduct of its business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 321, Sec. 9.   (AB 1391)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

1013.

Whenever it appears to the commissioner that any of the conditions set forth in section 1011 exist or that irreparable loss and injury to the property and business of a person specified in section 1010 has occurred or may occur unless the commissioner so act immediately, the commissioner, without notice and before applying to the court for any order, forthwith shall take possession of the property, business, books, records and accounts of such person, and of the offices and premises occupied by it for the transaction of its business, and retain possession subject to the order of the court. Any person having possession of and refusing to deliver any of the books, records or
 assets of a person against whom a seizure order has been issued by the commissioner, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and punishable by fine not exceeding one thousand dollars or imprisonment not exceeding one year, or both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1935, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

1014.

Whenever the commissioner makes any seizure as provided in section 1013, it shall, on the demand of the commissioner, be the duty of the sheriff of any county of this State, and of the police department of any municipal corporation therein, to furnish him with such deputies, patrolmen or officers as may be necessary to assist the commissioner in making and enforcing any such seizure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1935, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

1015.

Immediately after such seizure, the commissioner shall institute a proceeding as provided for in section 1011 and thereafter shall proceed in accordance with the provisions of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1935, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

1016.

(a) If at any time after the issuance of an order under Section 1011, or if at the time of instituting any proceeding under this article, including under Section 1011, it shall appear to the commissioner that it would be futile to proceed as conservator with the conduct of the business of that person, he or she may apply to the court for an order to liquidate and wind up the business of the person. Upon a full hearing of that application, the court may make an order directing the winding up and liquidation of the business of that person by the commissioner, as liquidator, for the purpose of carrying out the order to liquidate and wind up the business of that person.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the court may issue an order to liquidate and wind up the business of a person as to whom a verified application is filed pursuant to subdivision (j) of Section 1011 based solely on the verified application and hearing as provided for in subdivision (a) of Section 1011.1, without further hearing, or may issue an order to liquidate and wind up the business of the person upon application by the commissioner after the issuance of an order under Section 1011. The court’s order may direct the winding up and liquidation of the business of the person by the commissioner, as liquidator, for the purpose of carrying out the order to liquidate and wind up the business of the person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 321, Sec. 10.   (AB 1391)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

1017.

(a) In the commissioner’s application for an order for the liquidation of a domestic corporation, or at any time thereafter, the commissioner may apply for, and the court shall make, an order dissolving the corporation.

(b) At any time during a proceeding for the liquidation of a domestic corporation authorized under Section 1016, the commissioner may apply for, and the court shall make, an order to permit the commissioner to sell the charter and license of that corporation while
 continuing to administer and distribute the remaining assets according to the provisions of this article. The order shall provide that the liabilities of the domestic corporation may not be transferred with the charter and license. In continuing the administration and distribution of assets the commissioner need not establish a liquidating trust or other, similar entity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 578, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1018.

The recording in the office of a county recorder of any county in the State of an order entered pursuant to section 1011, 1016 or 1017 shall impart the same notice that would be imparted by the recordation of a deed, bill of sale or other evidence of title duly executed by such person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1935, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

1019.

Upon the issuance of an order of liquidation under section 1016, the rights and liabilities of any such person and of creditors, policyholders, shareholders and members, and all other persons interested in its assets, including the State of California, shall, unless otherwise directed by the court, be fixed as of the date of the entry of the order in the office of the clerk of the county wherein the application was made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1939, Ch. 934.)
-------------------------------------------

1020.

Upon the issuance of an order either under Section 1011 or 1016, or at any time thereafter, the court shall issue such other injunctions or orders as may be deemed necessary to prevent any or all of the following occurrences:

(a) Interference with the commissioner or the proceeding.

(b) Waste of assets of such person.

(c) The institution or prosecution of any actions or proceedings.

(d) The obtaining of preferences,
 judgments, attachments, or other liens against such person or its assets.

(e) The making of any levy against any such person or its assets.

(f) The sale or deed for nonpayment of taxes or assessments levied by any taxing agency of property:

(1) Owned by such person.

(2) Upon which such person holds an encumbrance.

(3) Upon which such person has prior thereto commenced an action to foreclose any deed of trust or mortgage or has exercised the power of sale under any trust deed or mortgage which sale or foreclosure proceedings have not yet been completed or upon which no trustee’s deed or judgment of court or sheriff’s certificate of sale has been issued. “Taxing agency” as used in this
 section has the meaning ascribed to it by Section 121 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. The injunctions or orders authorized by this subdivision may be modified, dissolved or rescinded by the court on motion of the commissioner, the State Controller, the person charged with the collection of taxes or assessments on such property, or any person beneficially interested in the property. The recording in the office of the county recorder of any county in the State of an order or injunction issued pursuant to this section, shall constitute service of such order or injunction upon any taxing agency with respect to property or interests therein located in such county.

(g) Any managing general agent or attorney in fact from withholding from the commissioner any books, records, accounts, documents or other writing relating to the business of such person; provided, however, that, if by contract or otherwise any of the same are the property of such an
 agent or attorney, the same shall be returned when no longer necessary to the commissioner or at any time the court after notice and hearing shall so direct.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1460.)
-------------------------------------------

1021.

(a) Upon the making of an order to liquidate the business of such person, the commissioner shall publish notice to its policyholders, creditors, shareholders, and all other persons interested in its assets. The order and the notice shall require claimants to file their claims with the commissioner, together with proper proofs thereof, within six months to one year, at the commissioner’s discretion, after the date of first publication of such notice, in the manner specified in this article.

(b) The time period specified in subdivision (a) shall not apply to the California Insurance Guarantee Association or the California Life and Health Insurance Guarantee Association provided it files with the commissioner a notice of possible claim within such six-month period and files actual claim or claims within such periods of time as may be permitted by order of court.

(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (a), both of the following apply:

(1) If the commissioner determines that the business subject to liquidation order possesses, or is likely to possess, insufficient assets to permit significant distribution to a person interested in those assets, the commissioner may decline to handle a claim submitted pursuant to subdivision (a), as long as the notice requirements of subdivision (a) and Section 1022 are observed.

(2) If the commissioner reasonably determines that the business subject to liquidation order possesses, or is likely to possess, insufficient assets to permit significant distribution of funds to pay the expenses of administration under this article, as provided in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1033, the commissioner may decline to continue, and may abandon, the insolvency proceeding upon providing notice pursuant to subdivision (a) and Section 1022.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 578, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1022.

The notice shall be published in newspapers of general circulation in geographic areas pertinent to the liquidation. The notice shall reference a source, either the liquidated company’s or the liquidator’s Internet Web site, where ongoing information for creditors shall be provided. A copy of the notice, accompanied by an affidavit of due publication, including a statement of the date of publication, shall be filed with the clerk
 of the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 786, Sec. 13.   (AB 2303)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1023.

A claim must set forth, under oath, on the form prescribed by the commissioner:

(a) The particulars thereof, and the consideration therefor.

(b) Whether said claim is secured or unsecured, and, if secured, the nature and amount of such security.

(c) The payments, if any, made thereon.

(d) That the sum claimed is justly owing from such person to the claimant.

(e) That there is no offset to the claim.

(f) Such other data or supporting documents as the commissioner requires.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1935, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

1024.

Unless such claim is filed in the manner and within the time provided in section 1021, it shall not be entitled to filing or allowance, and no action may be maintained thereon. In the liquidation, pursuant to the provisions of this article, of any domestic insurer which has issued policies insuring the lives of persons, the commissioner shall, within thirty days after the last day set for the filing of claims, make a list of the persons who have not filed proofs of claim with him and to whom, according to the books of said insurer, there are amounts owing under such policies, and he shall set opposite the name of each person the amount so owing to such person. Each person
 whose name shall appear upon said list shall be deemed to have duly filed, prior to the last day set for the filing of claims, a claim for the amount set opposite his name on said list.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1935, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

1025.

Claims founded upon unliquidated or undetermined demands must be filed within the time limit provided in this article for the filing of claims, but claims founded upon such demands shall not share in any distribution to creditors of a person proceeded against under section 1016 until such claims have been definitely determined, proved and allowed. Thereafter, such claims shall share ratably with other claims of the same class in all subsequent distributions.

An unliquidated or undetermined claim or demand within the meaning of this article shall be deemed to be any such claim or demand upon which a right of action has accrued at the
 date of the order of liquidation and upon which the liability has not been determined or the amount thereof liquidated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1939, Ch. 934.)
-------------------------------------------

1025.5.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 1021 to 1025, inclusive, the commissioner may, in lieu of requiring claimants to file separate claims:

(a) File a claim himself or herself on behalf of all claimants for return premiums.

(b) Permit any assignee of the right of the insured to a return premium
 by virtue of a valid assignment, as security or otherwise, made prior to an order under Section 1011 or a seizure under Section 1013, whichever is earlier in time in the particular case, to file one claim as assignee on behalf of all insureds having assigned rights to the assignee, which shall set forth such information as may be required under Section 1023.

(c) Permit the California Insurance Guarantee Association under subdivision (b) of Section 1063.4, or the California Life and Health Insurance Guarantee Association under paragraph (1) of subdivision (k) of Section 1067.07 to file one claim, for its association, combining all assigned claims and setting forth the information that the commissioner may require under Section 1023.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 334, Sec. 1.   (SB 1408)   Effective September 27, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1026.

Whenever any person has a cause of action against an insured and such cause is covered by a liability policy, such person, if the insurer is adjudged insolvent, may file a claim in the liquidation proceeding even if the claim is undetermined or unliquidated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1935, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

1026.1.

Where a claim arising out of a policy of insurance has been filed by a third party and approved by the liquidator and such claim has subsequently been paid or satisfied, either wholly or in part, by the transfer of anything of value, either voluntarily or by process, from the insured of the person in liquidation to such third party, then upon the filing with the liquidator of proof of the making and value of such transfer, to the extent and in the manner required by the liquidator, the insured shall be subrogated to the rights of the third party claimant to the extent that the claim has been satisfied and discharged, but the rights of the insured shall not exceed the face
 value of such claim and if the insured has theretofore filed a claim covering the same subject matter, he is entitled to only one recovery.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 271.)
-------------------------------------------

1027.

A claim by a third party founded upon an insurance policy may be allowed by the liquidator without requiring such claim to be reduced to judgment, provided it can be reasonably inferred from the proof presented that the claimant would be able to obtain a judgment upon his cause of action against the insured and that such judgment would represent a liability of the person in liquidation under the policy of insurance upon which such claim is founded.

In the event several claims founded upon one policy or bond are filed, and the aggregate amount of such claims exceeds the liability limit of said policy or bond, and one or more of such
 claims is unliquidated and undetermined, then all of such claims shall be deemed unliquidated and undetermined; provided, however, that should one or more of said claims become determined and proved within the time provided in this article, the liquidator, upon any distribution to creditors, shall impound the distribution percentage of the face amount of said claim or claims so determined and proved, not exceeding the policy or bond limit, and upon such claim or claims becoming liquidated as to amount, the liquidator shall release to such claimant the distribution percentage of the final liquidated value of such claims out of the funds so impounded.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1935, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

1028.

A judgment taken by default, or by collusion, against an insured shall not be considered as evidence, in the liquidation proceeding, either of the liability of such insured to such claimant upon such cause of action or of the amount of damages to which such claimant is entitled.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1935, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

1029.

A claim of a secured claimant shall not be allowed in a sum greater than the excess over the value of the security of the amount for which the claim would be allowable if unsecured, unless the claimant surrenders the security to the liquidator. Upon such surrender the claim may be allowed in the full amount for which it is valued.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1935, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

1030.

The value of the security to be credited upon such claim shall be determined by an appraiser appointed by the liquidator and approved by the court. Such claimant shall elect to accept the security or to release it to the liquidator.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1935, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

1030.5.

(a) The liquidator may require, as a condition of payment of the final liquidation dividend to a lender, or his assignee, who has filed a claim for an unearned premium as an assignee of the insured for valuable consideration, that such assignee of the insured shall assign to the liquidator all his right, title, and interest in any unsatisfied debt of the insured to such assignee, pertaining to policies of the insolvent insurer, remaining unpaid after crediting the final liquidation dividend, if the amount of such unsatisfied debt is less than one hundred dollars and one cent ($100.01).

The liquidator may also
 require, as condition precedent, the delivery to him of all the documents giving rise to such debt.

The liquidator, in his sole discretion, may determine whether or not it will be feasible to attempt to collect any such assigned debt. If he determines not to pursue collection of any such debt, he shall file a declaration to that effect with the liquidation court and be relieved of any further responsibility in respect to such debt.

(b) As used in this section, “insured” means a natural person who purchased insurance from the insolvent insurer for personal, family, or household purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1205.)
-------------------------------------------

1030.6.

In any proceeding under this article, no agent shall be liable to the liquidator or conservator for unearned premiums uncollected by the agent, or unearned commissions uncollected by the agent, arising from an insolvency of an insurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 672, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1031.

Mutual debts or mutual credits, whether arising out of one or more contracts between the person in liquidation under Section 1016 and any other person, shall be set off and the balance only shall be allowed or paid, except with respect to any of the following obligations as described in subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive:

(a) The obligation of the person in liquidation to such other person does not entitle such other person claiming such set-off to share as a claimant in the assets of the person in
 liquidation.

(b) The obligation of the person in liquidation to the other person was purchased by, or transferred to, the other person.

(c) The obligation of the other person to the person in liquidation is to pay an assessment levied against the other person or to pay a balance upon a subscription for shares of the capital stock of the person in liquidation.

(d) The obligations between the other person and the person in liquidation arise from business where either the person in liquidation or the other person has assumed risks and obligations from the other party and then has ceded back to that party substantially the same risks and obligations.

Notwithstanding the foregoing, a set-off of amounts due on obligations arising from those contracts shall be allowed if the
 balance arises from contracts that were entered into, renewed, or extended with the express written approval of the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 580, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1032.

When a claim is rejected by the commissioner, written notice of rejection shall be given by mail, addressed to the claimant at the address set forth in his claim. Within thirty days after the mailing of the notice the claimant may apply to the court in which the liquidation proceeding is pending for an order to show cause why the claim should not be allowed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1935, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

1033.

(a) Claims allowed in a proceeding under this article shall be given preference in the following order:

(1) Expense of administration.

(2) All claims of the California Insurance Guarantee Association or the California Life and Health Insurance Guarantee Association, and associations or entities performing a similar function in other states, together with claims for refund of unearned premiums and all claims under
 insurance and annuity policies or contracts, including funding agreements, of an insolvent insurer that are not covered claims.

The following claims are excluded from this priority:
